Wisconsin, session 2025, AB1154.
do enact as follows:AB1154,11Section 1. 947.01 (1) of the statutes is renumbered 947.01 (1) (intro.) and 2amended to read:AB1154,2,43947.01 (1) (intro.) Whoever, in a public or private place, engages in violent, 4abusive, any of the following is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor:AB1154,2,75(b) Abusive, indecent, profane, boisterous, unreasonably loud or otherwise 6disorderly conduct under circumstances in which the conduct tends to cause or 7provoke a disturbance is guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.AB1154,28Section 2. 947.01 (1) (a) of the statutes is created to read:AB1154,3,21947.01 (1) (a) Violent behavior that involves the use or attempted use of 2physical force or the use of or threat to use a dangerous weapon.AB1154,33Section 3. 968.075 (1) (a) (intro.) of the statutes is renumbered 968.075 (1) 4(am) (intro.) and amended to read:AB1154,3,115968.075 (1) (am) (intro.) “Domestic abuse” means any of the following engaged 6in by the intentional infliction of physical pain, physical injury, or illness; the 7intentional impairment of physical condition; a violation of s. 940.225 (1), (2), or (3); 8or a physical act that may cause the other individual reasonably to fear imminent 9engagement in conduct described in this paragraph, if the actor is an adult person 10and engages in the conduct against his or her spouse or former spouse, against an 11any of the following individuals:AB1154,3,13122. An adult with whom the person resides or formerly resided or against an 13actor is cohabiting or has cohabited as a spouse, a parent, or a legal guardian.AB1154,3,14143. An adult with whom the person actor has a child in common:.AB1154,415Section 4. 968.075 (1) (a) 1. to 4. of the statutes are repealed.AB1154,516Section 5. 968.075 (1) (ag) of the statutes is created to read:AB1154,3,1817968.075 (1) (ag) “Dating relationship” has the meaning given in s. 813.12 (1) 18(ag).AB1154,619Section 6. 968.075 (1) (am) 1., 4., 5. and 6. of the statutes are created to read:AB1154,3,2020968.075 (1) (am) 1. An adult who is a relative of the actor.AB1154,3,22214. An adult who is similarly situated to the actor as a spouse, a parent, or a 22legal guardian.AB1154,3,23235. An individual with whom the actor has or had a dating relationship.AB1154,4,216. An adult who is residing or has resided with the actor if subd. 1., 2., 3., 4., 2or 5. does not apply.AB1154,73Section 7. 968.075 (1) (f) of the statutes is created to read:AB1154,4,44968.075 (1) (f) “Relative” means any of the following:AB1154,4,551. A spouse or former spouse.AB1154,4,662. A parent or stepparent.AB1154,4,773. A legal guardian.AB1154,88Section 8. Nonstatutory provisions.AB1154,4,139(1) Cross-reference change. In the statutes indicated, replace “968.075 (1) 10(a)” with “968.075 (1) (am)”: 49.138 (1m) (c), 103.10 (1m) (b) 1., 165.85 (3) (cm) 6., 11631.95 (1) (c), 895.45 (1) (a), 904.04 (2) (b) 1., 939.621 (1) (a) and (2), 940.43 (8), 12940.45 (7), 948.015 (9), 973.017 (6m) (a) 2., 973.06 (1) (av) 2. a. and b., 973.09 (2) (a) 131. b., and 973.20 (1r).AB1154,4,1414